Illinois, session 104th, SB4085.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $18,680,000, or so much of that sum 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State 7Treasurer's Administrative Fund to the Office of the State 8Treasurer to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal year 9ending June 30, 2027. 10    Section 10. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum 11as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 12Fund to the State Treasurer for the purpose of making refunds 13of accrued interest on protested tax cases. 14    Section 15. The sum of $28,050,000, or so much of that sum 15as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Pensions 16Fund to the Office of the State Treasurer to meet its 17operational expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 18    Section 20. The sum of $10,035,000, or so much of that sum 19as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State 20Treasurer's Bank Services Trust Fund to the State Treasurer   SB4085- 2 -SDS104 00056 NBW 10056 b1for the operational expenses authorized under the State 2Treasurer's Bank Services Trust Fund Act. 3    Section 25. The following amounts, or so much of those 4amounts as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 5purposes named in this Section, are appropriated to the State 6Treasurer for the payment of interest on and retirement of 7State bonded indebtedness:8   For payment of principal and interest on any and all bonds 9issued pursuant to the Anti-Pollution Bond Act, the 10Transportation Bond Act, the Capital Development Bond Act of 111972, the School Construction Bond Act, the Illinois Coal and 12Energy Development Bond Act, and the General Obligation Bond 13Act: 14  From the General Obligation Bond Retirement and Interest 15Fund: 16   Principal...................................$2,375,840,00017   Interest....................................$1,347,891,98518    Total                                      $3,723,731,985 19    Section 30. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 21Obligation Bond Rebate Fund to the State Treasurer for the 22purpose of making arbitrage rebate payments to the United 23States government.   SB4085- 3 -SDS104 00056 NBW 10056 b1    Section 35. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that sum 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Charitable Trust 3Stabilization Fund to the State Treasurer for the State 4Treasurer's operational costs to administer the Charitable 5Trust Stabilization Fund and for grants to public and private 6entities in the State for the purposes set out in the 7Charitable Trust Stabilization Act. 8    Section 40. The sum of $500,000, or so much of that sum as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Treasurer's 10Capital Fund for the construction, reconstruction, renovation, 11repair, operation, and maintenance of the buildings, grounds, 12and facilities of the State Treasurer. 13    Section 45. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much of that sum 14as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Higher 15Education Savings Program Fund to the Office of the State 16Treasurer for the Illinois Higher Education Savings Program. 17ARTICLE 99918    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192026.